
F05328

A
*
1
J11J/C

1
2B

11
W−B

3

4

8

5

13

LG−R

L−B

R−Y

L−W

L−Y

7

6
S8

TSW2

TSW1

UPSW

DNSW

NSWLG−R

L−B

R−Y

L−W

L−Y

W−B

W−B

A

7

6

58

20

18

19

Suspension Control Switch

Cowl Side J/B LH

IF

Suspension Control ECU

8

7

(Damping Mode Select Switch)

S8

S8

S8

S8

IK1

IK1

IK1

IK1

IK1

IK1

*
2
J18J/C

*
1
:LHD

*
2
:RHD

DI−278 −DIAGNOSTICS ACTIVEHEIGHTCONTROLSUSPENSION&
SKYHOOK TEMS

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)

DTC C 1787 / 87 Damping Mode Select Switch Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This circuit is sending the signal to the ECU to switch over to the damping mode selected by the damping
mode select switch.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1787 / 87
TSW1 and TSW2 of damping mode select switch signals do
not change.

SDampingmodeselectswitch
SDampingmodeselectswitchcircuit
SSuspensioncontrolECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkoutputsignalofdampingmodeselectswitch.

INCASEOFUSINGHAND −HELDTESTER:
PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchONandpush thehand −held tes-

ter main switch ON.
(c)Select theDATALISTmodeon thehand −held tester.

CHECK:
Check the damping mode select switch condition displayed on
thehand −held testerwhenchanging thedampingmodeselect
switch to each mode.
OK:

Damping mode select switch must display the condi-
tion as the following table.

Switch position Switch condition

”COMFORT”
”ON” is displayed for TSW1 of damping mode select switch condition.
”OFF” is displayed for TSW2 of damping mode select switch condition.

”NORMAL” ”ON” is displayed for TSW1 and TSW2 of damping mode select switch condition.

”SPORT 1”
”OFF” is displayed for TSW1 of damping mode select switch condition.
”ON” is displayed for TSW2 of damping mode select switch condition.

”SPORT 2” ”OFF” is displayed for TSW1 and TSW2 of damping mode select switch condition.
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INCASEOFNOTUSINGHAND −HELDTESTER:
PREPARATION:
Remove the suspension control ECU with connectors still con-
nected.
CHECK:
(a)Turn the ignitionswitchON.
(b) Measure voltage between terminals TSW1 and TSW2 of

suspension control ECU connector and body ground
whenchanging thedampingmodeselectswitch toeach
mode.

OK:

Terminal Switch position Voltage

”COMFORT” 9 − 14V

TSW1 B d d
”NORMAL” 9 − 14V

TSW1 − Bodyground
”SPORT 1” Below 1.5 V

”SPORT 2” Below 1.5 V

”COMFORT” Below 1.5 V

TSW2 B d d
”NORMAL” 9 − 14V

TSW2 − Bodyground
”SPORT 1” 9 − 14V

”SPORT 2” Below 1.5 V

OK No problem.

NG
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2 Check damping mode select switch.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the suspension control switch.
(b) Disconnect the suspension control switch (for damping

mode select switch) connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals 3, 4 and 8 of suspen-
sion control switch (for damping mode select switch) connector
when changing the damping mode select switch to each mode.
OK:

Terminal Switch position Resistance

”COMFORT” 0 � (Continuity)

3 8
”NORMAL” 0 � (Continuity)

3 − 8
”SPORT 1” � � (Open)

”SPORT 2” � � (Open)

”COMFORT” � � (Open)

4 8
”NORMAL” 0 � (Continuity)

4 − 8
”SPORT 1” 0 � (Continuity)

”SPORT 2” � � (Open)

NG Replace suspension control switch.

OK

3 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between damping
mode select switch and suspension control ECU (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace suspension control ECU.


